Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. Production, Inspection and Stamping

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 28, 32, 36-37, 40-44, 46-47, 49-52; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 8, 9, 20.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 3; 3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 16 to 30, 117, 118.

§ 11-23-101.
Sale of carcass without inspection prohibited; inspection fees; disposition
thereof.

It is unlawful for any
person to sell, offer for sale or possess for the purpose of sale
or disposal the carcass or any part thereof of cattle without having
the unmutilated hide inspected by an inspector. The person presenting
the hide and carcass or any part thereof shall pay the inspection
fee prescribed by law for each hide inspected, the fee shall be remitted
to the board.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 39, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-618; C.S. 1945, § 56-1101; Laws 1957, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-421; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 35; W.S. 1977, §

11-26-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 1.

§ 11-23-102.
Only inspected livestock to be slaughtered; record of cattle slaughtered.

It is unlawful for any person operating any slaughterhouse, packing plant or rendering plant in Wyoming to slaughter or cause to be slaughtered any horses, mules or cattle before each animal has been inspected for brands and ownership by an authorized Wyoming brand inspector not more than seven (7) days before slaughter.

Every person engaged in slaughtering cattle shall keep a record of all cattle slaughtered, naming the person from whom the cattle were purchased, his place of residence and the age, sex and brands of the cattle slaughtered. The record shall at all times be open for inspection by any person.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 2007; C.S. 1910, § 2615; C.S. 1920, § 3108; R.S. 1931, § 67-220; C.S. 1945, § 56-524; Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 17; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-341, 11-349; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 8; 1967, ch. 97, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-23-121,

11-23-202

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-103.
Purchase of unstamped carcass prohibited.

It is unlawful for any
person to purchase from any other person the carcass or any part thereof
of any cattle unless the carcass or part purchased is stamped as provided
by law. The district court of the county wherein the sale or purchase
takes place has jurisdiction of the offense.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 39, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 67-622; C.S. 1945, § 56-1105; W.S. 1957, § 11-424; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 36; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-102; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-104.
Exhibition, upon demand, of hides or certificate of inspection thereof
of cattle killed for beef.

Any person who kills
cattle for beef or has in his possession the carcass or any part of
such cattle, must on demand of an inspector, sheriff or deputy sheriff
show either the hide of the animal killed or the certificate of inspection
of the hide. Any person failing to secure a certificate of inspection
shall retain the hide, without mutilation of the brand, until the
beef is consumed.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 39, § 4; 1931, ch. 21, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-621; C.S. 1945, § 56-1104; W.S. 1957, § 11-425; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 37; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-103; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-105.
Penalties.

Any person violating
any provision of W.S.

11-23-101

through

11-23-104

shall be fined not less than seven hundred seventy-five
dollars ($775.00) or more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00),
or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 39, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 67-623; C.S. 1945, § 56-1106; W.S. 1957, § 11-426; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-104; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 7, ch. 39, Laws 1929, repealed ch. 27, Laws 1927.

§ 11-23-106.
“Cold storage locker plant” defined; stamp on tag; certificate in
lieu of stamp; filing and inspection of certificate; penalties.

“Cold storage locker plant” means any place, premises or establishment where facilities for the cold storage and preservation of human food in separate and individual compartments are offered to the public upon a rental or other basis for private profit.

No operator or employee of any cold storage locker plant in Wyoming shall accept from any person for processing, quick freeze or cold storage any beef, mutton, lamb or pork unless it is properly stamped or tagged showing it to have been lawfully slaughtered, or in the absence of a proper stamp or tag the person offering the meat may deposit at the time with the operator or his employee a signed certificate stating:

The owner of the meat;

The kind of meat;

The weight of the meat; and

The name and address of the person from whom acquired or if slaughtered by the person offering same, the date and place of slaughter.

The certificate shall be kept on file by the operator for one (1) year from its date and be made available for inspection upon request of any law enforcement officer or authorized representative of the board.

Any person violating this section or making any false statement in the certificate shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2, 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-427, 11-428, 11-430; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-26-105, 11-26-106, 11-26-108; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

§ 11-23-107.
Killing of horses for meat; unmutilated hide or certificate of inspection
to be produced; penalties.

Any person who kills any horse for the purpose of using, selling or offering for sale the meat or carcass for tankage, or for the purpose of feeding the same to domestic stock or to fur bearing animals, must produce on demand of any inspector or peace officer either the unmutilated hide of the animal killed or a certificate of inspection of the hide, issued by a livestock inspector.

Any person violating this section shall be fined not less than seven hundred seventy-five dollars ($775.00) or more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 13, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 67-1801, 67-1802; C.S. 1945, §§ 56-1107, 56-1108; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-431, 11-432; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 38; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-26-109, 11-26-110; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

§ 11-23-108.
Mutilation of hide from horse; penalties; allegations in prosecutions.

Any person who willfully or maliciously mutilates, destroys or conceals any hide from any horse, mule, jack, jennet, bovine animal, goat, hog or sheep with the intent to remove evidence of ownership of the hide or the animal from which the hide was removed, shall be fined not less than seven hundred seventy-five dollars ($775.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or imprisoned not more than one (1) year, or both.

In any prosecution for the violation of this section it is not necessary for the state to allege in the complaint or information the ownership of the hide or the animal from which the hide was removed, but it is sufficient to allege that the owner of the hide or the animal from which the hide was removed is unknown and that the hide or animal is not the property of the defendant.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 22, §§ 1 to 3; R.S. 1931, §§ 67-1001 to 67-1003; C.S. 1945, §§ 56-1109 to 56-1111; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-433 to 11-435; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-26-111 to 11-26-113; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 4, ch. 22, Laws 1931, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.